apertium_ben_in_canonical_forms.dix
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isa</l><r>yA<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
-->

</pardef>
<pardef n="k/oI__p">
<e><p><l>isIne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIke</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIke</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>isImeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isImeM_se</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isImeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isImeM_se</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMke</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMke</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>inhIMmeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMmeM_se</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMmeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMmeM_se</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="koI"><i>k</i><par n="k/oI__p"/></e>
